Utah, session 2026, HB367.
Section 1. Section 54-15-109 is enacted to read:54-15-109. Optional time-of-use export pricing tariff.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Real-time pricing" means pricing for excess customer-generated electricity that reflects the value of customer-generated electricity at the hour it is delivered to the electrical corporation.(b)"Seasonal time-of-use pricing" means pricing for excess customer-generated electricity that establishes predetermined export credit rates for defined periods, generally corresponding to climatic seasons, that reflect the value of customer-generated electricity for the period.(c)"Time-of-use export pricing tariff" means a tariff approved by the commission that provides differential pricing for excess customer-generated electricity using either seasonal time-of-use pricing or real-time pricing.(2)The commission shall require each electrical corporation with a net metering program or other program to compensate customers for their excess customer-generated electricity to make available to customers enrolling in or participating in such programs a time-of-use export pricing tariff.(3)The commission may approve one or more time-of-use export pricing tariffs.(4)Each time-of-use export pricing tariff shall:(a)use one of the following pricing methods:(i)seasonal time-of-use pricing; or(ii)real-time pricing;(b)allow a customer participating in a time-of-use export pricing tariff to determine when the customer exports excess customer-generated electricity to the electrical corporation; and(c)provide differential rates for crediting excess customer-generated electricity.(5)A customer participating in a net metering or a net billing program:(a)may elect to participate in a time-of-use export pricing tariff on a voluntary basis;(b)is not required to participate in a time-of-use export pricing tariff; and(c)may change between tariff options in accordance with the terms and conditions established by the commission.(6)An electrical corporation shall:(a)provide clear written disclosure to a customer before the customer elects to participate in a time-of-use export pricing tariff that explains:(i)how the time-of-use export pricing tariff differs from alternative tariffs available to the customer;(ii)the time periods and corresponding credit rates under the time-of-use export pricing tariff; and(iii)the customer's ability to return to the customer's previous tariff; and(b)allow a customer participating in a time-of-use export pricing tariff to return to the customer's previous tariff in accordance with terms and conditions established by the commission.(7)A time-of-use export pricing tariff:(a)shall be compatible with metering equipment approved under Section 54-15-103; and(b)may include provisions for coordination with battery storage systems or other energy storage technologies.(8)The commission shall establish a time-of-use export pricing tariff as required by this section no later than one year after the effective date of this section.(9)Nothing in this section:(a)modifies or impairs the rights of a customer participating in a net metering or net billing program under an existing tariff or rate schedule;(b)requires a customer to change from an existing tariff or rate schedule; or(c)affects the authority of the commission to determine costs and benefits under Section 54-15-105.1 or to establish charges, credits, or ratemaking structures under this chapter.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.